Missouri, session 2026, HB2600.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 190.050, 190.051, 190.052, 190.070, and 190.090, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 190.050,
190.051, 190.052, 190.070, and 190.090, to read as follows:
190.050. 1. After the ambulance district has been declared organized, the declaring
county commission[, except in counties of the second class having more than one hundred
five thousand inhabitants located adjacent to a county of the first class having a charter form
of government which has a population of over nine hundred thousand inhabitants, shall divide
the district into six election districts as equal in population as possible, and shall by lot
number the districts from one to six inclusive. The county commission shall cause an election
to be held in the ambulance district within ninety days after the order establishing the
ambulance district to elect ambulance district directors. Each voter shall vote for one director
from the ambulance election district in which the voter resides. The directors elected from
districts one and four shall serve for a term of one year, the directors elected from districts
two and five shall serve for a term of two years, and the directors from districts three and six
shall serve for a term of three years; thereafter, the terms of all directors shall be three years.
All directors shall serve the term to which they were elected or appointed, and until their
successors are elected and qualified, except in cases of resignation or disqualification. The
county commission shall reapportion the ambulance districts within sixty days after the
population of the county is reported to the governor for each decennial census of the United
States. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the number of candidates for the office
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2600 2
of director is no greater than the number of directors to be elected, no election shall be held,
and the candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their offices at the same time and in the
same manner as if they have been elected.
2. In all counties of the second class having more than one hundred five thousand
inhabitants located adjacent to a county of the first class having a charter form of government
which has a population of over nine hundred thousand inhabitants,] shall order an election
be held on the next regularly scheduled election date and the voters shall vote for six
directors elected at large from within the district for a term of three years. [Those directors
holding office in any district in such a county on August 13, 1976, shall continue to hold
office until the expiration of their terms, and their successors shall be elected from the district
at large for a term of three years. In any district formed in such counties after August 13,
1976, the governing body of the county shall cause an election to be held in that district
within ninety days after the order establishing the ambulance district to elect ambulance
district directors.] Each voter shall vote for six directors. The two candidates receiving the
highest number of votes at such election shall be elected for a term of three years, the two
candidates receiving the third and fourth highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of
two years, the two candidates receiving the fifth and sixth highest number of votes shall be
elected for a term of one year; thereafter, the term of all directors shall be three years. A
director holding office as of August 28, 2026, shall continue as an at-large director for
the remainder of such director's existing term.
[3.] 2. A candidate for director of the ambulance district shall, at the time of filing, be
a citizen of the United States, [a qualified voter of the election district as provided in
subsection 1 of this section,] a resident of the district for two years next preceding the
election, and shall be at least twenty-four years of age. In an established district which is
located within the jurisdiction of more than one election authority, the candidate shall file his
or her declaration of candidacy with the secretary of the board. In all other districts, a
candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy with the county clerk of the county in which he
or she resides. A candidate shall file a statement under oath that he or she possesses the
required qualifications. No candidate's name shall be printed on any official ballot unless the
candidate has filed a written declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 5 of section
115.127. If the time between the county commission's call for a special election and the date
of the election is not sufficient to allow compliance with subsection 5 of section 115.127, the
county commission shall, at the time it calls the special election, set the closing date for filing
declarations of candidacy.
3. Any ambulance district may adopt and establish election subdistricts by
ordinance, providing that each election subdistrict shall be composed of contiguous
territory as compact and as nearly equal in population as may be, and that each board

HCS HB 2600 3
member shall be a resident of the election subdistrict that they represent at the time of
their election and for the duration of their term. Such ordinance shall only be adopted,
amended, or repealed by a two-thirds majority vote of the board of directors.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if the number of
candidates for the office of director is less than the number of directors to be elected, no
election shall be held, and the candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their offices
at the same time and in the same manner as if they were elected.
190.051. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 190.050 and 190.052 to the
contrary, upon a [motion] resolution adopted by the board of directors in districts where
there are six-member boards, and upon approval by the voters in the district, the number of
directors may be increased to seven [with one board member running district wide,] or
decreased to five or three board members. The resolution shall state the names of the
existing directors who will fill the positions on the board if such measure is approved by
the voters, as well as any vacancies to be filled by subsequent election, and shall state the
dates on which those terms shall conclude.
2. The ballot to be used for the approval of the voters to increase or decrease the
number of members on the board of directors of the ambulance district shall be substantially
in the following form:
Shall the number of members of the board of directors of the ______
(Insert name of district) Ambulance District be (increased to seven
members/decreased to five members/decreased to three members)?
YES NO
[2.] 3. If a majority of the voters voting on a proposition to increase the number of
board members [to seven] vote in favor of the proposition, then at the next election of board
members after the voters vote to increase the number of directors, the voters shall select [one
person to serve in addition to the existing six directors as the member who shall run district
wide] additional persons to fill any such vacancies.
[3.] 4. If a majority of the voters voting on a proposition to decrease the number of
board members vote in favor of the proposition, then the [county clerk shall redraw the
district into the resulting number of subdistricts with equal population bases and hold
elections by subdistricts pursuant to section 190.050] existing board members stated in the
board resolution shall complete the terms specified therein. Thereafter, members of the
board shall be elected to serve terms of three years and until their successors are duly elected
and qualified.
[4. Members of the board of directors in office on the date of an election pursuant to
this section to increase or decrease the number of members of the board of directors shall

HCS HB 2600 4
serve the term to which they were elected or appointed and until their successors are elected
and qualified.]
190.052. Any member of the board of directors who moves residency from the
district [from which the member was elected] shall be disqualified as a member of the board.
If one or two vacancies occur in the membership of the board as a result of death, resignation,
or disqualification, the remaining members shall appoint one or two qualified persons, as
provided in section 190.050, to fill the vacancies until the end of the unexpired term. Such
appointment shall be made with the consent of a majority of the remaining members of the
board. If the board is unable to agree in filling a vacancy [within sixty days or if there are
more than two vacancies at any one time], the county commission, upon [notice from the
board of failure to agree in filling the vacancies] the written request of a majority of the
remaining board members or the ambulance service administrator, as described in
section 190.112, shall within [ten] thirty calendardays fill them by appointment of qualified
persons, as provided in section 190.050, and shall notify the persons in writing of their
appointment. The persons appointed shall serve for the unexpired term.
190.070. 1. A petition for annexation of land to an ambulance district shall be signed
by not less than ten percent or fifty voters, whichever is fewer, residing within the territory
therein described proposed for annexation and shall be [filed with the county clerk of the
county in which the district or the greater portion thereof is situated, and shall be addressed to
the commissioners of the county commission] presented to the board of directors of the
ambulance district. A hearing shall be held thereon as nearly as possible as in the case of a
formation petition. If upon the hearing the [commissioners of the county commission find]
board of directors finds that the petition is in compliance with the provisions of sections
190.005 to 190.085, they shall order the question to be submitted to the voters within the
territory and within the district.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form to all of the
voters in the existing ambulance district and the area proposed to be annexed:
Shall ______ (description of territory) be annexed to the ______ ambulance district,
and a tax imposed within such annexed area equal to the existing rate of the _____
ambulance district?
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the question [in the district and in the territory
described in the petition, respectively,] are in favor of the annexation, the [commissioners of
the county commission shall by order declare] board of directors shall enact an ordinance
incorporating the territory annexed and shall describe the altered boundaries of the district.
A copy of the same shall be filed with the county clerk.
190.090. 1. Two or more organized ambulance districts may consolidate into one
ambulance district by following the procedures set forth in this section.

HCS HB 2600 5
2. If the consolidation of existing ambulance districts is desired, a number of voters
residing in an existing ambulance district equal to ten percent of the vote cast for governor in
the existing district in the next preceding gubernatorial election may file with the county clerk
in which the territory or greater part of the proposed consolidated district is situated a petition
requesting the consolidation of two or more existing ambulance districts.
3. The petition shall be in the following form:
We, the undersigned voters of the ______ ambulance district do hereby petition that _
_____ existing ambulance districts be consolidated into one consolidated ambulance district
to be known as the _____ Ambulance District, subject to the attached consolidation
plan.
4. An alternative procedure of consolidation may be followed, if the board of
directors of the existing ambulance districts pass a resolution in the following form:
Be it resolved by the board of directors of the ambulance district that the ______
ambulance districts be consolidated into one consolidated ambulance district to be known as
the _____ Ambulance District, subject to the attached consolidation plan.
5. Every petition or resolution shall be accompanied by a consolidation plan
outlining the process for the proposed consolidation. At a minimum, the consolidation
plan shall include the following:
(1) The name of the proposed consolidated district, a legal description of the
boundaries of such consolidated district, and the proposed tax levy to be imposed by the
consolidated district. In the event that the proposed plan is for the consolidation into an
existing district, the consolidation plan shall clearly state that the existing district shall
continue as the legal entity into which the other districts are consolidated;
(2) The names of the districts to be consolidated, accompanied by a list of all real
property owned and financial assets currently held by the district, all outstanding bonds
or debts of each of said districts, and the current tax levies imposed by each of said
districts;
(3) The name of the district which shall be responsible for maintaining
ambulance service during the consolidation, including continuing operations,
administration, and governance of the consolidated district, provided that there shall
be a presumption that the district with the largest operating budget in the preceding
fiscal year shall assume such responsibility;
(4) The proposed number of board members and specific individuals who will
serve as the initial directors, provided that such directors shall be chosen from among
the existing board members of the districts to be consolidated such that there is at least
one director from each of the districts to be consolidated; and

HCS HB 2600 6
(5) A proposed time line for consolidation, which shall not exceed one hundred
eighty days, provided that such time line shall be subject to modification by the board of
the consolidated district for good cause.
6. Upon the filing of a petition, or a resolution, and a consolidation plan with the
county clerk from each of the ambulance districts proposed to be consolidated, the county
clerk shall present the petition or resolution and consolidation plan to the commissioners of
the county commission [having jurisdiction who shall thereupon order the submission of the
question to the voters of the districts. The filing of each of the petitions in the ambulance
districts shall have occurred within a continuous twelve-month period.
6. The notice shall set forth the names of the existing ambulance districts to be
included in the consolidated district.
7. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the existing ______ ambulance districts be consolidated into one ambulance
district?
8. If the county commission having jurisdiction finds that the question to consolidate
the districts received a majority of the votes cast, the commission shall make and enter its
order declaring that the proposition passed.
9. Within thirty days after the district has been declared consolidated, the county
commission shall divide the district into six election districts and shall order an election to be
held and conducted as provided in section 190.050 for the election of directors.
10. Within thirty days after the election of the initial board of directors of the district,
the directors shall meet and the time and place of the first meeting of the board shall be
designated by the county commission. At the first meeting the newly elected board of
directors shall choose a name for the consolidated district and shall notify the clerk of the
county commission of each county within which the consolidated district is located of the
name of the consolidated district.
11. On the thirtieth day following the election of the board of directors, the existing
ambulance districts shall cease to exist and the consolidated district shall assume all of the
powers and duties exercised by those districts. All assets and obligations of the existing
ambulance districts shall become assets and obligations of the consolidated district], who
shall record such documents in the records of the county. A petition or resolution for a
proposed consolidation shall be received from all ambulance districts within the same
calendar year or shall be considered null and void.
7. Each of the ambulance districts seeking to consolidate shall post the notice of
the intent to consolidate in the same manner as district public meetings are posted. In
addition, publication of such notice of intent shall be made in a newspaper of general
circulation in every county in which the proposed consolidated ambulance district shall

HCS HB 2600 7
be located, with publication to be made once per week for two consecutive weeks. A
public hearing shall be held jointly by all ambulance districts seeking to consolidate at a
location within the boundaries of the proposed consolidated ambulance district,
provided that such hearing shall be no more than ten days after the date of the second
publication. The notice of intent shall be in substantially the following form:
NOTICE OF THE FILING OF A PETITION/RESOLUTION FOR
CONSOLIDATION OF THE ______ AMBULANCE DISTRICTS
To all voters, residents, and interested persons within the boundaries
of the above described ambulance districts: You are hereby notified
that a petition/resolution has been filed for the consolidation of the
above named ambulance districts into one consolidated ambulance
district to be known as _____ Ambulance District. A proposed
consolidation plan is available for inspection at the office of the
County Clerk of _____ County.
A public hearing will be held on ______ (date) at ________ (time) at
the following location: ________. The purpose of this public hearing
shall be to explain the reasons for the consolidation and answer
questions from the public.
Objections to this consolidation may be filed with the County Clerk of
_____ County, provided such objections are filed in writing not less
than thirty days after the public hearing. Any such objection must be
signed by a number of voters residing in the proposed consolidated
district that is not less than five percent of the votes cast for governor
in the district in the most recent gubernatorial election.
100 8. If no objections are filed with the county clerk within thirty days after the
101 public hearing, then within forty-five days following the date of the public hearing, the
102 county commission shall order the districts consolidated pursuant to the terms of the
103 consolidation plan and shall further appoint as directors those individuals identified in
104 the consolidation plan. The county commission shall further set a date, time, and
105 location for the first meeting of the directors of the newly consolidated district.
106 9. Upon receipt of any objections filed, the county clerk shall verify that such
107 objections are signed by the necessary number of voters of the district. If said
108 objections are signed by an appropriate number of voters, the county commission of
109 each county in which the proposed consolidated district is to be located shall thereupon
110 order the submission of the question to the voters of the districts. The question shall be
111 submitted in substantially the following form:

HCS HB 2600 8
112 Shall the existing ______ ambulance districts be consolidated into one
113 ambulance district to be known as the _________ Ambulance District,
114 with such consolidated district authorized to levy a property tax not
115 to exceed the annual rate of ______ cents on the hundred dollars
116 assessed valuation or a sales tax in an amount not to exceed ______
117 percent, or a combination of both?
118
119 If the county commission having jurisdiction finds that the question to consolidate the
120 districts received a majority of the votes cast, the commission shall make and enter its
121 order declaring that the proposition passed. The county commission shall further order
122 the districts consolidated pursuant to the terms of the consolidation plan and shall
123 further appoint as directors those individuals identified in the consolidation plan. The
124 county commission shall further set a date, time, and location for the first meeting of the
125 directors of the newly consolidated district.
126 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the consolidated
127 district may impose an initial tax levy up to the highest tax levy of the consolidating
128 districts, provided such tax levy is specifically set forth in the ballot language submitted
129 to and approved by the voters of the consolidating district.
130 11. Without a vote of the residents of the consolidated district as provided in this
131 section, no consolidated ambulance district shall be permitted to impose a property tax
132 greater than the lowest of any existing property tax rate of the districts to be
133 consolidated, nor shall the consolidated ambulance district be permitted to impose any
134 sales tax greater than the lowest of any existing sales tax rate of the districts to be
135 consolidated.
136 12. Upon written certification by the board of directors of the consolidated
137 district to the prior district that the consolidated district has obtained the necessary
138 licenses and permits to operate an ambulance service and all directors of such
139 consolidated district have completed the training required by section 190.053, the
140 existing ambulance districts shall cease to exist and the consolidated district shall
141 assume all of the powers and duties exercised by those districts. All assets and
142 obligations of the existing ambulance districts shall become assets and obligations of the
143 consolidated district.
144 13. Any ambulance district that has contracted for ambulance service with
145 another ambulance district for more than five consecutive years may submit a joint
146 resolution executed by the boards of both ambulance districts to the county clerk of the
147 county in which the larger area of the proposed consolidated district is located,

HCS HB 2600 9
148 requesting consolidation of said districts by consolidating the smaller districts into the
149 larger district. Such resolution shall be accompanied by a consolidation plan as
150 provided in this section. Upon the receipt of such joint resolution, the county
151 commission shall promptly order the smaller districts consolidated into the larger
152 district pursuant to the terms of the consolidation plan without the necessity of
153 providing notice or public hearing.
✔